Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 2. Merger, Consolidation, and Conversion.

Sec. 10.25.240.
Merger.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, one or more cooperatives, each designated in this section as “merging cooperative,” may merge into another cooperative, designated in this section as “surviving cooperative,” by complying with the following requirements:

the proposition for the merger of the merging cooperatives into the surviving cooperative and proposed articles of merger shall be submitted to the members of each merging cooperative and of the surviving cooperative; the notice shall have attached to it a copy of the proposed articles of merger;

if the proposed merger and the proposed articles of merger, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of each cooperative voting on them, articles of merger in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each cooperative by its presiding officer and its seal shall be affixed by the officer designated by the board.

A merger of electric or telephone cooperatives may not take effect unless the surviving cooperative expressly agrees to comply with the terms of each collective bargaining agreement entered into between a merging cooperative and a labor organization representing employees of the cooperative that is in effect on the date of merger.

History.

(§ 18(1) — (2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am §§ 17, 18 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.245.
Merger of cooperative and corporation organized under AS 10.05.
[Repealed, § 24 ch 134 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 10.25.250.
Contents of articles of merger.

The articles of merger must recite that they are executed under this chapter and must state

the name of each merging cooperative and the address of its principal office;

the name of the surviving cooperative and the address of its principal office;

a statement that each merging cooperative and the surviving cooperative agree to the merger;

the names and addresses of the directors of the surviving cooperative;

the terms and conditions of the merger and the manner of carrying it into effect, including the manner in which members of the merging cooperatives may or shall become members of the surviving cooperative.

The articles of merger may contain provisions not inconsistent with this chapter that are considered necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the surviving cooperative.

The presiding officer of each cooperative shall make and annex to the articles an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section regarding the articles were complied with by the cooperative.

History.

(§ 18(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 8 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.260.
Consolidation.

Two or more cooperatives, designated in this section as “consolidating cooperative,” may consolidate into a new cooperative, designated in this section as the “new cooperative,” by complying with the following requirements:

the proposition for the consolidation into the new cooperative and proposed articles of consolidation shall be submitted to the members of each consolidating cooperative; the notice shall have attached to it a copy of the proposed articles of consolidation;

if the proposed consolidation and the proposed articles of consolidation, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of each consolidating cooperative voting on them, articles of consolidation in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of each consolidating cooperative by its presiding officer and its seal shall be affixed and attested by the officer designated by the board.

History.

(§ 17(1) — (2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 19 ch 134 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.270.
Contents of articles of consolidation.

The articles of consolidation must recite that they are executed pursuant to this chapter and must state

the name of each consolidating cooperative and the address of its principal office;

the name of the new cooperative and the address of its principal office;

a statement that each consolidating cooperative agrees to the consolidation;

the names and addresses of the directors of the new cooperative;

the terms and conditions of the consolidation and the manner of carrying it into effect, including the manner in which members of the consolidating cooperatives may or shall become members of the new cooperative.

The articles of consolidation may contain provisions not inconsistent with this chapter that are considered necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the new cooperative.

The presiding officer of each consolidating cooperative executing the articles of consolidation shall make and annex to the articles an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section regarding the articles were complied with by the cooperative.

History.

(§ 17(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 99 SLA 1995)

Sec. 10.25.280.
Effect of consolidation or merger.

In the case of a consolidation the existence of the consolidating cooperatives ceases and the articles of consolidation are the articles of incorporation of the new cooperative. In the case of a merger the separate existence of the merging cooperatives ceases and the articles of incorporation of the surviving cooperative are amended to the extent that changes are provided for in the articles of merger.

The rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, and all real and personal property including, without limitation, applications for membership, all debts due on whatever account, and all other choses in action, of the consolidating or merging cooperatives are transferred to and vested in the new consolidated or surviving cooperative without further act or deed.

The new consolidated or surviving cooperative is responsible and liable for the liabilities and obligations of each of the consolidating or merging cooperatives and a claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against the consolidating or merging cooperatives may be prosecuted as if the consolidation or merger had not taken place, but the new consolidated or surviving cooperative may be substituted in its place.

Neither the rights of creditors nor liens upon the property of the cooperatives are impaired by the consolidation or merger.

History.

(§ 19 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.25.290.
Conversion of existing corporation.

A corporation organized under the laws of the state and supplying or having the corporate power to supply electric energy or to furnish telephone or related telecommunications service may be converted into a cooperative by complying with the requirements of this section and thereupon becomes subject to this chapter as if originally organized under this chapter.

The proposition for the conversion of the corporation into a cooperative and proposed articles of conversion shall be submitted to a meeting of the members or stockholders of the corporation, or in case of a corporation having no members or stockholders, to a meeting of the incorporators of the corporation. The notice of the meeting shall have attached to it a copy of the proposed articles of conversion.

If the proposition for the conversion of the corporation into a cooperative and the proposed articles of conversion, with any amendments, are approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of those members of the corporation voting on them or, if the corporation is a stock corporation, by the affirmative vote of the holders of not less than two-thirds of those shares of the capital stock of the corporation represented at the meeting and voting on them, or, in the case of a corporation having no members and no shares of its capital stock outstanding, by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of its incorporators, articles of conversion in the form approved shall be executed and acknowledged on behalf of the corporation by its presiding officer and its seal shall be affixed and attested by the officer designated by the board.

History.

(§ 20(1) — (2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 11 ch 99 SLA 1995; am § 15 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory paragraph was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) and (2) were redesignated as subsections (b) and (c) respectively.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, in (a), added “or related telecommunications” following “to furnish telephone”, and made related changes.

Sec. 10.25.300.
Articles of conversion: contents and use as articles of incorporation.

The articles of conversion must recite that they are executed under this chapter and must state

the name of the corporation and the address of its principal office prior to its conversion into a cooperative;

the statute or statutes under which it was organized;

a statement that the corporation elects to become a cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporation subject to this chapter;

its name as a cooperative;

the address of the principal office of the cooperative;

the names and addresses of the directors of the cooperative;

the manner in which members, stockholders, or incorporators of the corporation are to become members of the cooperative.

The articles of conversion may contain provisions not inconsistent with this chapter considered necessary or advisable for the conduct of the business of the cooperative.

The presiding officer executing the articles of conversion shall make and annex to it an affidavit stating that the provisions of this section were complied with regarding the articles. The articles of conversion are the articles of incorporation of the cooperative.

History.

(§ 20(2) ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 12 ch 99 SLA 1995)